src/third_party/mozjs/extract/intl/locales/fi/hyphenation/hyph_fi.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
1ba
1be
1bi
1bo
1bu
1by
1da
1de
1di
1do
1du
1dy
1dä
1dö
1fa
1fe
1fi
1fo
1fu
1fy
1ga
1ge
1gi
1go
1gu
1gy
1gä
1gö
1ha
1he
1hi
1ho
1hu
1hy
1hä
1hö
1ja
1je
1ji
1jo
1ju
1jy
1jä
1jö
1ka
1ke
1ki
1ko
1ku
1ky
1kä
1kö
1la
1le
1li
1lo
1lu
1ly
1lä
1lö
1ma
1me
1mi
1mo
1mu
1my
1mä
1mö
1na
1ne
1ni
1no
1nu
1ny
1nä
1nö
1pa
1pe
1pi
1po
1pu
1py
1pä
1pö
1ra
1re
1ri
1ro
1ru
1ry
1rä
1rö
1sa
1se
1si
1so
1su
1sy
1sä
1sö
1ta
1te
1ti
1to
1tu
1ty
1tä
1tö
1va
1ve
1vi
1vo
1vu
1vy
1vä
1vö
1st2r
ä2y
y1a2
y1o2
o1y
ö2y
u1y2
y1u2
ö3a2
ö3o2
ä3a2
ä3o2
ä1u2
ö1u2
a1ä
a1ö
o1ä
o1ö
u1ä2
u1ö2
ä2ä
ö2ö
ä2ö
ö2ä
aa1i2
aa1e2
aa1o2
aa1u2
ee1a2
ee1i2
ee1u2
ee1y2
ii1a2
ii1e2
ii1o2
uu1a2
uu1e2
uu1o2
uu1i2
e1aa
i1aa
o1aa
u1aa
u1ee
a1uu
i1uu
e1uu
o1uu
ää1i
ää1e
ää3y
i1ä2ä
e1ä2ä
y1ä2ä
iö2ö
a1ei
a1oi
e1ai
i1au
y1ei
ai1a
ai1e
ai1o
ai1u
au1a
au1e
eu1a
ie1a
ie1o
ie1y
io1a2
io1e2
iu1a
iu1e
iu1o
oi1a
oi1e
oi1o
oi1u
o1ui
ou1e
ou1o
ue1a
ui1e
uo1a
uo1u
e1ö2
ö1e2
.ä2
u2s
y1li
yli1o2p
a1li
ali1a2v
sp2l
sp1li
a1lo
alou2s1
keu2s1
r1ta
rtau2s1
soh1je
sa1si
2s1a2sia
a1si
1a2sian
1a2siat
1a2sioi
l2as
so1pi
2s1o2pisk
no1pe
2n1o2pet
sa1lo
2s1a2loi
no1pi
2n1o2pist
2s1o2pist
so1sa
no1sa
al1ke
alkei2s1
pe1ru
peru2s1
si1de
2s1i2dean
se1si
sesi1ty
ne1du
2n1e2du2s
sa1ja
saja1tu
2s1a1se
2s1a1pu
sy1ri
2s1y2rit
.y1di
.ydi2n1
.1su
.suu1ra
2s1y2h1ti
not1to
no1to
2n1oton
nan1to
2n1an1no
na1ja
2n1ai1ka
no1ma
2n1o2mai
ny1li
2n1y2lit
sa1le
2s1a2len
na1le
2n1a2len
asia1ka
1a2siaka2s1
u1lo
ulo2s1
na1jo
2s1a2jo
b1lo
bib3li
b1ri
b1ro
1b2ru
d2r
1d2ra
f2l
1f2la
f1ra
1f2re
g2l
1g2lo
g2r
1g2ra
k2l
k1ra
k1re
1k2ri
1k2v
1k2va
p2l
p2r
1p2ro
c2l
q2v
1q2vi
sc2h
ts2h
ch2r
